Nebraska statutes.
Section 1.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201087-301
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act,
unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Access software provider
means a provider of software, including client or server software, or enabling
tools that do any one or more of the following: (a) Filter, screen, allow,
or disallow content; (b) pick, choose, analyze, or digest content; or (c)
transmit, receive, display, forward, cache, search, subset, organize, reorganize,
or translate content;

(2) Appropriate inventory repurchase program means a program by
which a plan or operation repurchases, upon request and upon commercially
reasonable terms, when the salesperson's business relationship with the company
ends, current and marketable inventory in the possession of the salesperson
that was purchased by the salesperson for resale. Any such plan or operation
shall clearly describe the program in its recruiting literature, sales manual,
or contract with independent salespersons, including the disclosure of any
inventory that is not eligible for repurchase under the program;

(3) Article means a
product as distinguished from its trademark, label, or distinctive dress in
packaging;

(4) Attorney
General means the Attorney General of the State of Nebraska or the county
attorney of any county with the consent and advice of the Attorney General;

(5) Cable operator means
any person or group of persons (a) who provides cable service over a cable
system and directly or through one or more affiliates owns a significant interest
in such cable system or (b) who otherwise controls or is responsible for,
through any arrangement, the management and operation of such a cable system;

(6) Certification mark means a mark used in connection with the goods
or services of a person other than the certifier to indicate geographic origin,
material, mode of manufacture, quality, accuracy, or other characteristics
of the goods or services or to indicate that the work or labor on the goods
or services was performed by members of a union or other organization;

(7) Collective mark means a mark used by members of a cooperative,
association, or other collective group or organization to identify goods or
services and distinguish them from those of others, or to indicate membership
in the collective group or organization;

(8) Commercially
reasonable terms means the repurchase of current and marketable inventory
within twelve months from the date of purchase at not less than ninety percent
of the original net cost, less appropriate setoffs and legal claims, if any;

(9) Compensation
means a payment of any money, thing of value, or financial benefit;

(10) Consideration
means anything of value, including the payment of cash or the purchase of
goods, services, or intangible property. The term does not include the purchase
of goods or services furnished at cost to be used in making sales and not
for resale or time and effort spent in pursuit of sales or recruiting activities;

(11) Covered
file-sharing program means a computer program, application, or software that
enables the computer on which such program, application, or software is installed
to designate files as available for searching by and copying to one or more
other computers, to transmit such designated files directly to one or more
other computers, and to request the transmission of such designated files
directly from one or more other computers. Covered file-sharing program does
not mean a program, application, or software designed primarily to operate
as a server that is accessible over the Internet using the Internet Domain
Name System, to transmit or receive email messages, instant messaging, real-time
audio or video communications, or real-time voice communications, or to provide
network or computer security, network management, hosting and backup services,
maintenance, diagnostics, technical support or repair, or to detect or prevent
fraudulent activities;

(12) Current and marketable has its plain and ordinary meaning but
excludes inventory that is no longer within its commercially reasonable use
or shelf-life period, was clearly described to salespersons prior to purchase
as seasonal, discontinued, or special promotion products not subject to the
plan or operation's inventory repurchase program, or has been used or opened;

(13) Information content
provider means any person or entity that is responsible, in whole or in part,
for the creation or development of information provided through the Internet
or any other interactive computer service;

(14) Interactive computer service means any information
service, system, or access software provider that provides or enables computer
access by multiple users to a computer server, including specifically a service
or system that provides access to the Internet and such systems operated or
services offered by libraries or educational institutions;

(15) Inventory
includes both goods and services, including company-produced promotional materials,
sales aids, and sales kits that the plan or operation requires independent
salespersons to purchase;

(16) Inventory loading means that the plan or operation requires
or encourages its independent salespersons to purchase inventory in an amount
which exceeds that which the salesperson can expect to resell for ultimate
consumption or to a consumer in a reasonable time period, or both;

(17) Investment
means any acquisition, for a consideration other than personal services, of
personal property, tangible or intangible, for profit or business purposes,
and includes, without limitation, franchises, business opportunities, and
services. It does not include real estate, securities registered under the
Securities Act of Nebraska, or sales demonstration equipment and materials
furnished at cost for use in making sales and not for resale;

(18) Mark means a
word, name, symbol, device, or any combination of a
word, name, symbol, or device in any form or arrangement;

(19) Person means a natural person, a corporation, a government, or a governmental subdivision
or agency, a business
trust, an estate, a trust, a partnership, a joint venture, a limited liability company, an unincorporated association, a sole proprietorship, two
or more of any of the foregoing having a joint or common interest, or any
other legal or commercial entity;

(20) Pyramid
promotional scheme means any plan or operation in which a participant gives
consideration for the right to receive compensation that is derived primarily
from the recruitment of other persons as participants in the plan or operation
rather than from the sales of goods, services, or intangible property to participants
or by participants to others. A limitation as to the number of persons who
may participate, or the presence of additional conditions affecting eligibility,
or upon payment of anything of value by a person whereby the person obtains
any other property in addition to the right to receive consideration, does
not change the identity of the scheme as a pyramid promotional scheme;

(21) Referral
or chain referral sales or leases means any sales technique, plan, arrangement,
or agreement whereby the seller or lessor gives or offers to give a rebate
or discount or otherwise pays or offers to pay value to the buyer or lessee
as an inducement for a sale or lease in consideration of the buyer or lessee
giving to the seller or lessor the names of prospective buyers or lessees
or otherwise aiding the seller or lessor in making a sale or lease to another
person if the earning of the rebate, discount, or other value is contingent
upon the occurrence of an event subsequent to the time the buyer or lessee
agrees to buy or lease;

(22) Service
mark means a mark used in the sale
or advertising of services to identify the services of one person and distinguish
them from the services of others;

(23) Telecommunications
service means the offering of telecommunications for a fee directly to the
public, or to such classes of users as to be effectively available directly
to the public, regardless of the facilities used;

(24) Trademark means any word, name, symbol, or device or any
combination thereof adopted and used by a person to identify goods made or
sold by such person and to distinguish such goods from goods made or sold by others;

(25) Trade name means a word or a name, or any combination of
the foregoing in any form or arrangement used by a person to identify such person's business, vocation, or occupation
and distinguish such business, vocation, or occupation from
the business, vocation, or occupation of others; and

(26) Use or promote the
use of, for purposes of subdivision (a)(12) of section 87-302, means contrive,
prepare, establish, plan, operate, advertise, or otherwise induce or attempt
to induce another person to participate in a pyramid promotional scheme, including
a pyramid promotional scheme run through the Internet, email, or other electronic
communications.

Laws 1969, c. 855, § 1, p. 3221;

Laws 1974, LB 327, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 557;

Laws 2002, LB 857, § 6;

Laws 2010, LB801, § 1.
July 15, 2010
Securities Act of Nebraska, see section 8-1123.

The terms of the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act provide only for equitable relief consistent with general principles of equity. State ex rel. Stenberg v. Consumer's Choice Foods, 276 Neb. 481, 755 N.W.2d 583 (2008).

Attorney General and associates immune from suit for libel after initiating deceptive practices suit against plaintiffs. Ledwith v. Douglas, 568 F.2d 117 (8th Cir. 1978).

Successor to manufacturer in representing it owned trademark owned by distributor and in using trademark in its corporate name violated this act. Wrist-Rocket Manuf. Co., Inc. v. Saunders, 379 F.Supp. 902 (D. Neb. 1974).